Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Examinations and Licenses

§ 1712.
License required.

No person may practice optometry in this State who is not licensed under this chapter.

Licensing standards and procedures established by the Board shall be fair and reasonable and shall be designed and implemented to measure and reasonably ensure an applicant’s qualifications to practice the occupation. They shall not be designed or implemented for the purpose of limiting the size of the occupation.

If a licensee has a principal place of business for a licensed occupation, a license shall be prominently displayed at that place.

Licenses may not be transferred.

No persons may use the title “doctor of optometry,” “optometrist,” or any substantially equivalent title unless he or she is licensed under this chapter.

Nothing contained in subsection (a) of this section shall prevent a student from providing optometric services:

under the on-site supervision of a licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist at a State hospital;

as part of an optometric clinical program under the on-site supervision of a licensed optometry instructor of a school of optometry, a college, or an optometry department of a university recognized by the Board; or

as a student intern in a hospital under the on-site supervision of a licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 34a;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 1713.
Exemptions.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit other licensed health care professionals from practicing to the full extent of their licenses, nor to apply to any eye screening, State or government eye testing programs, nor to any instruction in any medical, osteopathic, or nursing school.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit persons or corporations from making mechanical repairs to spectacles, nor shall it prohibit any person, firm, or corporation engaged in grinding lenses and filling prescriptions from replacing lenses or filling prescriptions issued by a duly licensed optometrist or physician.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1714.
Repealed. 2009, No. 35, § 41(a).

§ 1715.
Licensure by examination.

The Board may grant a license to an applicant who:

has attained the age of majority;

is a graduate of an optometric school or college accredited by a regional or professional accreditation organization approved by the Board;

holds a current cardiopulmonary resuscitation certification from the American Red Cross, the Vermont Heart Association, or a comparable source recognized by the Director;

has successfully completed an examination approved by the Board; and

has paid the fee required by section 1718 of this chapter.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1983, No. 242

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2009, No. 35

, § 29;

2019, No. 30

, § 12.

§ 1716.
Licensure by endorsement.

The Board may issue a license to an applicant who is licensed and currently in good standing in a United States jurisdiction having license requirements that are substantially equivalent to the requirements of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 40

, § 23;

2009, No. 35

, § 30.

§ 1716a.
Renewal.

Licenses shall be renewed every two years upon payment of the required fee, provided that the person applying for renewal completes at least 40 hours of continuing education, approved by the Board, during the preceding two-year period and holds a current cardiopulmonary resuscitation certification.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1993, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 35

, § 31;

2019, No. 30

, § 12.

§ 1717.
Repealed.
1983, No. 242 (Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 1718.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay the following fees:

Application $225.00 (2) PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”>Biennial renewal $350.00

Click to view

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1983, No. 242

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 46;

1997, No. 59

, § 56, eff. June 30, 1997;

2005, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2013, No. 191

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.